Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Chapter 3 Accountants

Cross references. —

As to licensing provisions generally, see chapter 1 of this title.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

1 Am. Jur. 2d Accountants § 1 et seq.

Validity of statute or rule making specified conduct or condition the ground for cancellation or suspension irrespective of licensee's personal fault, 3 ALR2d 107.

Construction and application of statutory provisions respecting persons who may prepare tax returns for others, 10 ALR2d 1443.

Right of accountant to lien upon client's books and records in accountant's possession, 76 ALR2d 1322.

Statute authorizing revocation of license upon conviction as applicable to conviction based on plea of nolo contendere or non vult, 89 ALR2d 540.

Ownership of and literary property in working papers and data of accountant, 90 ALR2d 784.

Disqualification, for bias or interest, of member of occupation or profession sitting in license revocation proceeding, 97 ALR2d 1210.

Application of statute of limitations to damage action against public accountants for negligence in performance of professional services, 26 ALR3d 1438.

Comment note on hearsay evidence in proceedings before state administrative agencies, 36 ALR3d 12.

Liability of public accountant to third parties, 46 ALR3d 979.

Tax preparer's liability to taxpayer in connection with preparation of tax return, 81 ALR3d 1119.

Accountant's malpractice liability to client, 92 ALR3d 396.

Validity and construction of contractual restriction on right of accountant to practice, incident to sale of practice or withdrawal from accountancy partnership, 13 ALR4th 661.

Enforceability of covenant against competition in accountant's employment contract, 15 ALR4th 559.

Privileged communications between accountant and client, 33 ALR4th 539.

Application of statute of limitations to actions for breach of duty in performing services of public accountant, 7 ALR5th 852.

Liability of independent accountant to investors or shareholders, 48 ALR5th 389.

1 C.J.S. Accountants § 1 et seq.